aghul_nouns_formation.lexd
PATTERNS
Noun
Noun And
(Noun Ergative) > (Case | (Locative Dest)) 
Noun Plural > [:и] (Case | (Locative Dest))

LEXICON Plural
<pl>:ар #plur on cons
<pl>:вур

#Classes (эргатив, косвенные основы)
LEXICON Ergative
<erg>:а
<erg>:йи
<erg>:уни
<erg>:и
<erg>:ди

LEXICON And
<=и>:на
<=и>:ра

LEXICON Case
<gen>:н
<dat>:с
<instr>:лди
<comit>:фай
<comit>:хъай
<comit>:гlаьй

LEXICON Locative
<apud>:ф
<ante>:гь
<post>:хъ
<sub>:кк
<cont>:к
<in>:ъ
<super>:л
<inter>:гl


LEXICON Dest
<ess>:
<elat>:ас
<elat>:ес
<lat>:ди
